Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1215.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fair Congressional Redistricting Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." An application for a position as a commissioner on the Independent Congressional Redistricting Commission."Commission." The Independent Congressional Redistricting Commission established under section 301(a)."Secretary." The Secretary of the Commonwealth.CHAPTER 3INDEPENDENT CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING COMMISSIONSection 301. Establishment and conduct of commission.(a) Establishment.--In each year ending in zero, an Independent Congressional Redistricting Commission shall be established for the purpose of drawing the congressional district maps for this Commonwealth.20250HB1215PN1363 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Conduct.--The commission shall be convened no later than May 1 in each year ending in one. The commission shall have the following duties:(1) Conduct an open and transparent process enabling full public consideration of and comment on the drawing of congressional district maps.(2) Draw congressional district maps according to the redistricting criteria specified in this act.(3) Conduct itself with integrity and fairness.Section 302. Composition of commission.(a) Composition.--The commission shall consist of the following commissioners:(1) Five commissioners who are registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth.(2) Five commissioners who are registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(3) Five commissioners who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(b) Diversity.--The commission as a whole shall reflect the Commonwealth's geographic and demographic diversity, including racial, ethnic and gender diversity, to the greatest extent practicable.Section 303. Application process.(a) Administration.--The secretary shall administer an application process for individuals seeking appointment to the commission.(b) Process.--(1) The application period shall begin on November 15 in each year ending in zero and end on January 15 in each year 20250HB1215PN1363 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ending in one.(2) The secretary shall design the application to obtain all information necessary to determine each applicant's qualifications, party registration, relevant experiences, skills and commitments, including experiences with community leadership, skills in strategic planning and commitments to compromise and fairness. If the documentation submitted by an applicant is insufficient to determine whether the applicant is eligible to serve on the commission, the applicant shall be deemed ineligible to serve on the commission.(3) Beginning September 1 in each year ending in zero and ending on January 15 in each year ending in one, the secretary shall adequately provide public notice of the application process, including the following:(i) The application period, commissioner qualifications and selection process in the 10 most prominent print or online media outlets and in at least one prominent print publication in each of the 67 counties in this Commonwealth as determined by circulation or online readership.(ii) The application period, commissioner qualifications and the selection process on the home page of all publicly accessible Commonwealth agency Internet websites.(iii) The application period, commissioner qualifications and the selection process on local television stations during local news broadcasts in this Commonwealth.(iv) The application period, commissioner qualifications and the selection process in media outlets 20250HB1215PN1363 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that serve specific racial and ethnic communities in this Commonwealth.(4) The secretary shall continue to accept applications until all of the following are satisfied:(i) At least 60 individuals who are registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(ii) At least 60 individuals who are registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(iii) At least 60 individuals who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(5) If between November 15 and January 15 or the close of the application period, the secretary has not received at least 60 applications from the applicants specified under paragraph (4)(i), (ii) and (iii), the secretary shall continue to accept applications until all of the following are satisfied:(i) At least 60 individuals who are registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(ii) At least 60 individuals who are registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(iii) At least 60 individuals who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth have applied.(c) Required disclosures.--(1) An applicant must disclose, under the penalty of 20250HB1215PN1363 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 perjury, the following information pertaining to the six years before the submission of an application:(i) Party registration.(ii) Relevant leadership and community experiences.(iii) All political contributions over $250 to Federal, State or municipal candidates or to any committee supporting or opposing the election of candidates to Federal, State or municipal office.(iv) Contractual and other financial interests with the Commonwealth and with any other government-relatedentity.(2) Information disclosed under paragraph (1) shall be made publicly available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website under section 307(c).Section 304. Qualifications and terms of commissioners.(a) Qualifications.--(1) An individual shall be eligible to serve as a commissioner if, during the three years before submission of an application, the individual has met all of the following criteria:(i) The individual has been continuously registered as a voter in this Commonwealth.(ii) The individual has voted in one of the last three Statewide elections.(iii) The individual has been continuously registered to vote in this Commonwealth and is unaffiliated with a political party in this Commonwealth or the individual has been continuously registered with any of the following:(A) The largest political party in this 20250HB1215PN1363 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(B) The second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(C) A political party that is not the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(2) An individual may not serve as a commissioner if, during the six years before submission of an application, the individual:(i) has been a candidate for or has been elected or appointed to any Federal, State, county or first class or second class city office or judgeship;(ii) has served as an elected or appointed member of the Federal, State or county committee of a political party;(iii) has served as an officer, employee or paid consultant to a political party, a political action committee or a campaign committee of a candidate for Federal or State public office; or(iv) has been registered as a lobbyist as defined in 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A03 (relating to definitions) or a lobbyist under the Lobbying Disclosure Act of 1995 (Public Law 104-65, 2 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.).(3) Any of the following may not serve as a commissioner:(i) A staff member of, consultant to, contractor for or any individual with an immediate family relationship with an elected or appointed official or judge disqualified under paragraph (2)(i).(ii) A member of Congress.20250HB1215PN1363 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A member of the General Assembly.(iv) An employee of the secretary.(b) Terms.--A commissioner's term shall expire upon the appointment of the succeeding commission.Section 305. Selection and appointment of commissioners.(a) Selection.--(1) From the applications received, the secretary shall select 120 applicants who meet the requirements under this act to serve on the commission by February 15 of each year ending in one. The secretary shall give due consideration to promoting the racial, ethnic, demographic and gender diversity of the selected applicants.(2) The secretary shall divide the 120 applicants selected under paragraph (1) into the following categories:(i) Forty applicants who are registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth.(ii) Forty applicants who are registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(iii) Forty applicants who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(3) After selecting and dividing the applicants under paragraphs (1) and (2), the secretary shall transmit their applications to the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives. Upon receipt of the applications, the chair and minority chair the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives shall 20250HB1215PN1363 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reduce each category of applicants under paragraph (2) by five applicants for a total of 60 reductions by March 1 of each year ending in one. No more than one chair or minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate or the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives may remove an individual applicant from consideration. In reducing the size of each category of applicants under paragraph (2), the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives shall give due consideration to promoting the racial, ethnic, demographic and gender diversity of the commission.(b) Appointments.--(1) From the applicants remaining after the reduction of applicants under subsection (a), the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one commissioner who belongs to the appointer's political party by April 1 of each year ending in one. In making the appointments, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall give due consideration to promoting the overall racial, ethnic, demographic and gender diversity of the commission.(2) No later than April 7 of each year ending in one after the appointments are made under paragraph (1), the secretary shall, at a public meeting, randomly appoint the following:(i) One commissioner who is registered with the 20250HB1215PN1363 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 largest political party in this Commonwealth.(ii) One commissioner who is registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(iii) Three commissioners who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(3) After the appointments are made under paragraph (2), the nine commissioners appointed shall meet publicly, promptly review the remaining applications and by majority vote, including the vote of at least one commissioner appointed from each category of applicants under subsection (a)(2), appoint the final six commissioners. The final six commissioners shall consist of two commissioners appointed from each category of applicants under subsection (a)(2). The final six commissioners shall be appointed in a manner that ensures that the commission is as representative of the Commonwealth's geographic, racial, gender, ethnic and other demographic diversity as possible and possesses the relevant skills to perform the duties specified under this act.Section 306. Removal of commissioners and vacancies.(a) Removal.--(1) A commissioner may be removed by a majority vote of the other commissioners, comprised of no less than the following:(i) One commissioner who is registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth.(ii) One commissioner who is registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(iii) One commissioner who is not registered with the largest political party or the second-largest 20250HB1215PN1363 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 political party in this Commonwealth.(2) A commissioner may be removed after the commissioner receives proper notice and an opportunity to be heard if the commissioner:(i) exhibits a substantial neglect of duty or gross misconduct or is otherwise unable to discharge the commissioner's duties; or(ii) missed three consecutive meetings at which a vote is taken unless the absence is due to serious illness of the commissioner or death of the commissioner's immediate family member.(3) Any vote to remove a commissioner under paragraph (1) shall be in accordance with section 307(a).(4) As used in this subsection, the term "substantial neglect of duty" means any conduct that demonstrates a commissioner's inability to act with integrity and fairness, including the failure to comply with the communications disclosure required specified under section 307(d).(b) Vacancies.--The commission shall fill a vacancy created under subsection (a) by appointing a qualified individual who is willing to serve from the applicants selected under section 305(a)(1) and the same category of applicants under section 305(a)(2) that the commissioner who created the vacancy was appointed from before the vacancy was created.Section 307. Actions by commission.(a) Actions.--Actions by the commission shall be in a public meeting by the affirmative vote of no less than nine commissioners, including the following:(1) At least two commissioners registered with the largest political party in this Commonwealth.20250HB1215PN1363 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) At least two commissioners registered with the second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(3) At least two commissioners who are not registered with the largest political party or second-largest political party in this Commonwealth.(b) Chair and vice chair.--At the first meeting of the full commission, the commissioners shall select one of the commissioners to serve as a chair and one of the commissioners to serve as a vice chair. The chair and vice chair may not be registered with the same political party.(c) Internet website.--(1) No later than September 1 of each year ending in zero, the secretary shall establish a publicly accessible Internet website for the commission. Once the commissioners have been appointed under section 305 and a web manager has been hired by the secretary, the commission shall assume responsibility for managing and updating the Internet website.(2) The Internet website shall include all of the following information:(i) A description of the role of the commission.(ii) Timely information about the application process and public bidding process.(iii) Timely information about the time, place and purpose of commission meetings.(iv) A portal for the submission of proposed congressional district maps.(v) All congressional district maps drawn by the commission or submitted by the public.(vi) The underlying data used to create or evaluate 20250HB1215PN1363 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maps in a format easily usable for analysis.(vii) Precinct-level shapefiles and census block equivalency.(viii) Precinct-level results from Statewide primary and general elections for the past 10 years.(ix) All reports analyzing the maps and transcripts of the commission.(x) A video archive of all meetings of the commission.(3) The commission shall post any data regarding congressional redistricting on the publicly accessible Internet website at the same time the data is made available to the commission and the data shall be considered public record as defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Communications.--(1) The commission shall be considered a public body subject to 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings), the Right-to-Know Law and mileage reimbursement as provided by the laws of this Commonwealth.(2) Except for documents or communications subject to attorney-client privilege, documents or communications created or received by a commissioner, a commission staff member or a consultant to the commission as a part of the commission's duties under this act shall not be exempt by any privilege.(3) Records pertaining to a commission's action on a preliminary congressional district map or the analysis of a preliminary congressional district map shall be publicly disclosed on the commission's publicly accessible Internet 20250HB1215PN1363 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 website under subsection (c) as soon as practicable after the records are created.(4) A commissioner, commission staff member or consultant to the commissioner may not communicate with any outside persons attempting to influence the congressional district map drawing process outside of public meetings and public comment periods. To the extent that a commissioner, commission staff member or consultant to the commissioner receives a communication described under this paragraph, the communication shall be publicly disclosed on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website under subsection (c) as soon as practicable after the communication is received.(e) Public hearings.--(1) To identify communities of interest and obtain other information relevant to the drawing of congressional districts, the commission shall seek public input. Before any proposed congressional district maps are drawn, the commission shall hold no less than nine public hearings across this Commonwealth to solicit testimony from a representative cross-section of this Commonwealth's population. The commission shall provide at least 14 days' notice before a public hearing is held as specified under paragraph (2).(2) The commission shall adequately advertise a public hearing and schedule a public hearing in a manner to encourage attendance, including scheduling the public hearing outside of regular work hours and using technology that allows for real-time, virtual participation and feedback in the public hearing. The commission shall record a public hearing and post a video of the public hearing on the 20250HB1215PN1363 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission's publicly accessible Internet website under subsection (c) within three days of the public hearing.(f) Public participation.--(1) The commission shall provide a meaningful opportunity for all persons to participate in the congressional redistricting process, including the following:(i) Issuing the notice under subsection (e)(1) in multiple languages.(ii) Ensuring that adequate translation services are available at public hearings.(iii) Complying with all Federal and State law protections for individuals with disabilities.(2) If the initial public input during the commission's public hearings does not appear to represent the diversity of this Commonwealth, the commission shall take remedial steps, including conducting additional outreach, holding additional public hearings and identifying underrepresented communities.Section 308. Adoption of congressional district maps.(a) Public submissions.--During the proposed congressional district map drawing process, a member of the public may submit maps, portions of maps or other comments for consideration by the commission. Submissions under this subsection shall be made publicly available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website under section 307(c) and open to comment.(b) Proposed and final maps.--(1) The commission shall release a proposed congressional district map and display the proposed congressional district map for a minimum of 30 days for public comment in a manner designed to achieve the widest public access reasonably possible before acting to approve a 20250HB1215PN1363 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 final congressional district map.(2) The commission shall hold no fewer than six public hearings in different regions of this Commonwealth after the release of a proposed congressional district map under paragraph (1) and accept comments on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website under section 307(c) and through paper submissions. The commission may not hold more than one hearing in a congressional district.(3) Upon releasing a proposed congressional district map under paragraph (1), the commission shall release population data, geographic data, election data and any other data used to create or evaluate the proposed congressional district map.(4) Before approving a final congressional district map, the commission must make the final congressional district map available for public view and comment for at least seven days. No later than October 15 of each year ending in one, the commission shall act to approve a final congressional district map. Upon approval, the commission shall certify the final congressional district map to the secretary.(5) The commission shall release with a proposed congressional district map and the final congressional district map written evaluations that measure the maps against external metrics. The metrics shall include the following information:(i) The impact of the congressional district maps on the ability of racial or language minorities to elect candidates of choice.(ii) Measures of partisan fairness using multiple accepted methodologies.20250HB1215PN1363 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The degree to which the congressional district maps preserve or divide communities of interest and counties.Section 309. Prioritized redistricting criteria.(a) Map drawing criteria.--The commission shall establish single-member congressional districts using the following criteria specified in the following order of priority:(1) Congressional districts shall comply with the Constitution of the United States and all applicable Federal laws.(2) Congressional districts shall comply with the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(3) Congressional districts shall be geographically contiguous.(4) Congressional districts shall provide racial and language minorities with an equal opportunity to participate in the political process and shall not dilute or diminish their ability to elect candidates of choice by themselves or in a coalition with others.(5) Congressional districts shall respect the integrity of communities of interest to the extent practicable. Absent compelling evidence to the contrary, respecting communities of interest shall include minimizing county, city, borough and township boundary splits to the extent practicable. As used in this paragraph, the term "community of interest" shall not include common relationships with political parties or political candidates.(b) Prohibitions.--The commission shall comply with all of the following when drawing a final congressional district map:(1) A final congressional district map shall not, when 20250HB1215PN1363 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 considered on a Statewide basis, unduly favor or disfavor any political party, candidate or incumbent.(2) A congressional district in a final congressional district map shall not dilute or diminish the ability of racial and language minorities to elect candidates of their choice by themselves or in a coalition with others.(3) The commission shall not consider the addresses of incumbent members of Congress in the drawing of a final congressional district map and may only consider election data after the nine hearings soliciting public input on communities of interest have been conducted under section 307(e).(4) The commission shall not split precincts unless necessary to satisfy the congressional district map drawing criteria specified under subsection (a). If the commission finds it is necessary to split a precinct, the commission shall explain its decision in its written evaluation and inform the secretary.Section 310. Failure to adopt final congressional district map.(a) Transmission to General Assembly.--If the commission fails to adopt a final congressional district map by October 15 of each year ending in one, the final congressional district map made available for public view under section 308(b)(4) shall be transmitted to the General Assembly with the written evaluations under section 308(b)(5) no later than October 21 of each year ending in one. A commissioner may submit additional written comments with the final congressional district map transmitted under this subsection.(b) Approval of final map.--No later than December 1 of each year ending in one, the Senate and the House of Representatives 20250HB1215PN1363 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 must approve the same congressional district map transmitted under subsection (a) by a majority vote before the congressional district map can be certified as the final congressional district map by the secretary.(c) Process.--Within seven calendar days, the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall promptly bring the congressional district map transmitted under subsection (a) to the floor of the appropriate chambers for a floor vote. If the congressional district map does not garner votes totaling 50% plus one of the total number of voting members of the General Assembly in both chambers, the commission shall submit a new congressional district map to the General Assembly within seven days. The General Assembly shall vote on the new congressional district map in accordance with this section and the process specified under this subsection shall continue until a congressional district map garners a majority vote in the Senate and the House of Representatives.Section 311. Judicial review.(a) Legal standing.--The commission shall be the only entity with standing to defend a legal action regarding a final congressional district map from money appropriated by the General Assembly funding to defend an action. The commission shall select the legal counsel to defend a legal action regarding a final congressional district map.(b) Jurisdiction.--The Supreme Court shall have original jurisdiction in all proceedings in which a final congressional district map is subject to a legal action.(c) Petitions.--A registered voter in this Commonwealth may file a petition for legal action within 45 days after the final 20250HB1215PN1363 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 congressional district map has been certified by the secretary or approved by the General Assembly under section 310(b). The Supreme Court shall consolidate legal actions if multiple petitions are filed and prioritize redistricting-related petitions.Section 312. Funding of commission.(a) Compensation.--Commissioners shall be compensated at the rate of $300 for each day the commissioner is engaged in commission business. The compensation under this subsection shall be adjusted for inflation for each commission. Employees of the Department of State and commissioners shall be reimbursed for reasonable personal expenses incurred in connection with duties performed in accordance with this act and as otherwise prescribed by the laws of this Commonwealth for employees of this Commonwealth.(b) Funding.--The General Assembly shall allocate sufficient funding for the commission to meet estimated expenses for a three-year period, including expenses incurred in the selection of commissioners, hiring staff and a Statewide public education and outreach program.(c) Office space.--The Department of General Services shall make adequate office space available for the operation of the commission.(d) Commission staff.--(1) The commission shall hire technical staff, administrative staff, legal counsel, a web manager and other technical consultants as necessary through a public bid process in accordance with 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement).(2) A person employed by the commission shall act in the 20250HB1215PN1363 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public interest of the residents of this Commonwealth and not any individual, entity or special interest.CHAPTER 21MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2101. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 2102. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1215PN1363 - 21 - 123456789101112